New Jersey, session 222, S339.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Department of Environmental Protection shall not require a person under 16 years of age to obtain a horseback riding permit from the Division of Fish and Wildlife, or charge a person under 16 years of age a $2.00 nonrefundable permit application fee pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1986, c.198 (C.23:3-1c), to engage in horseback riding in a State wildlife management area. b.  The department may adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), any rules and regulations necessary to implement this section. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.